Tennessee, session 114, HB0067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-8103, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(j) The department of education shall compile a report on the number of students
who completed the early graduation program in the previous school year. The
department shall submit the report to the education committee of the senate and the
committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over kindergarten through
grade twelve (K-12) education by September 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0067
000967
- 1 -